Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF2339.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 3.8841, subdivision 9, is amended to read: Subd. 9. Powers; duties; Metropolitan Council appointments oversight. The commission must monitor appointments to the Metropolitan Council and may make recommendations on appointments to the deleted text begin nominating committee under section 473.123, subdivision 3, or to the governor before the governor makes the appointmentsdeleted text end new text begin appropriate appointing authority as described in section 473.123new text end . The commission may also make recommendations to the senate before deleted text begin appointments are presenteddeleted text end new text begin the governor's appointment is presented new text end to the senate for its advice and consent. Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 473.123, is amended to read: 473.123 METROPOLITAN COUNCIL. Subdivision 1. Creationnew text begin ; membershipnew text end . new text begin (a) new text end A Metropolitan Council with jurisdiction in the metropolitan area is established as a public corporation deleted text begin and political subdivisiondeleted text end of the state. It shall be under the supervision and control of deleted text begin 17deleted text end new text begin a chair selected as provided in subdivision 4 and 44new text end members, all of whom shall be residents of the metropolitan areadeleted text begin .deleted text end new text begin and who shall be appointed as follows:new text end new text begin (1) a county commissioner from each of Anoka, Carver, Dakota, Hennepin, Ramsey, Scott, and Washington Counties, appointed by the respective county boards; new text end new text begin (2) a local elected official or citizen representative appointed from each Metropolitan Council district by the municipal committee for the council district established in subdivision 2b, unless a district is completely within a single city, in which case the member must be appointed by the city council of that city; new text end new text begin (3) the commissioner of transportation or the commissioner's designee; new text end new text begin (4) one person to represent nonmotorized transportation, appointed by the commissioner of transportation; new text end new text begin (5) one person to represent freight transportation, appointed by the commissioner of transportation; and new text end new text begin (6) one person to represent public transit, appointed by the commissioner of transportation. new text end new text begin (b) The office of a local elected official identified in paragraph (a) and the office of a Metropolitan Council member are compatible offices and one person may hold both offices. new text end new text begin (c) Notwithstanding any change to the definition of metropolitan area in section 473.121, subdivision 2, the jurisdiction of the Metropolitan Council is limited to the seven-county metropolitan area. new text end Subd. 2a. Terms. new text begin (a) new text end Following each apportionment of council districts, as provided under subdivision 3a, deleted text begin council members must be appointed from newly drawn districts as provided in subdivision 3a. Each council member, other than the chair, must reside in the council district represented. Each council district must be represented by one member of the council. The terms of members end with the term of the governor, except that all terms expire on the effective date of the next apportionment. A member serves at the pleasure of the governor.deleted text end new text begin the municipal committee for each council district shall appoint a local elected official or citizen representative to serve on the Metropolitan Council. The local elected official or citizen representative must reside in the district. The terms of members appointed by municipal committees are staggered as follows: members representing an odd-numbered district have terms ending the first Monday in January of the year ending in the numeral "5"; and members representing an even-numbered district have terms ending the first Monday in January in the year ending in the numeral "7." Thereafter, the term of each member is four years, with terms ending the first Monday in January, except that all terms expire on the effective date of the next apportionment. A member's position on the Metropolitan Council becomes vacant if the member ceases to be a local elected official or as provided in chapter 351, and any vacancy must be filled as soon as practicable for the unexpired term in the same manner as the initial appointment. new text end A member shall continue to serve the member's district until a successor is appointed and qualified; except that, following each apportionment, the member shall continue to serve at large until the deleted text begin governor appoints 16 council members, onedeleted text end new text begin municipal committee for the council district appoints a membernew text end from deleted text begin each ofdeleted text end the newly drawn council deleted text begin districtsdeleted text end new text begin districtnew text end as provided under subdivision 3a, to serve terms as provided under this section. The appointment to the council must be made by the first Monday in March of the year in which the term ends. new text begin (b) The terms of members appointed by county boards are staggered as follows: members representing the counties of Anoka, Dakota, Ramsey, and Scott have terms ending the first Monday in January of the year ending in the numeral "1"; and members representing the counties of Carver, Hennepin, and Washington have terms ending the first Monday in January of the year ending in the numeral "3." Thereafter, the term for each member is four years. A member's position on the Metropolitan Council becomes vacant if the member ceases to be a local elected official or as provided in chapter 351, and any vacancy must be filled as soon as practicable for the unexpired term in the same manner as the initial appointment. new text end new text begin (c) An individual appointed by the commissioner of transportation under subdivision 1 serves at the pleasure of the appointing authority. new text end new text begin (d) Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, an individual appointed to the Metropolitan Council under subdivision 1, paragraph (a), clause (1), (2), or (3), is subject to recall by their appointing body at any point during the individual's term. new text end new text begin Subd. 2b. new text end new text begin Municipal committee in each council district. new text end new text begin The governing body of each home rule charter or statutory city and town in each Metropolitan Council district shall appoint a member to serve on a municipal committee for the council district. If a city or town is in more than one council district, the governing body must appoint a member to serve on each council district's municipal committee. A member appointed to a council district's municipal committee must reside in the council district. The municipal committee must meet at least quarterly to discuss issues relating to the Metropolitan Council. Municipal committee meetings are subject to the Minnesota Open Meeting Law, chapter 13D. new text end new text begin Subd. 2c. new text end new text begin Compensation. new text end new text begin The council must pay members $....... per year and the chair $....... per year plus reimbursement of actual and necessary expenses as approved by the council. If the member is a local elected official, this compensation is in addition to any compensation as a local elected official. new text end deleted text begin Subd. 3. deleted text end deleted text begin Membership; appointment; qualifications. deleted text end deleted text begin (a) Sixteen members must be appointed by the governor from districts defined by this section. Each council member must reside in the council district represented. Each council district must be represented by one member of the council. deleted text end deleted text begin (b) In addition to the notice required by section 15.0597, subdivision 4, notice of vacancies and expiration of terms must be published in newspapers of general circulation in the metropolitan area and the appropriate districts. The governing bodies of the statutory and home rule charter cities, counties, and towns having territory in the district for which a member is to be appointed must be notified in writing. The notices must describe the appointments process and invite participation and recommendations on the appointment. deleted text end deleted text begin (c) The governor shall create a nominating committee, composed of seven metropolitan citizens appointed by the governor, to nominate persons for appointment to the council from districts. Three of the committee members must be local elected officials. Following the submission of applications as provided under section 15.0597, subdivision 5, the nominating committee shall conduct public meetings, after appropriate notice, to accept statements from or on behalf of persons who have applied or been nominated for appointment and to allow consultation with and secure the advice of the public and local elected officials. The committee shall hold the meeting on each appointment in the district or in a reasonably convenient and accessible location in the part of the metropolitan area in which the district is located. The committee may consolidate meetings. Following the meetings, the committee shall submit to the governor a list of nominees for each appointment. The governor is not required to appoint from the list. deleted text end deleted text begin (d) Before making an appointment, the governor shall consult with all members of the legislature from the council district for which the member is to be appointed. deleted text end deleted text begin (e) Appointments to the council are subject to the advice and consent of the senate as provided in section 15.066. deleted text end deleted text begin (f) Members of the council must be appointed to reflect fairly the various demographic, political, and other interests in the metropolitan area and the districts. deleted text end deleted text begin (g) Members of the council must be persons knowledgeable about urban and metropolitan affairs. deleted text end deleted text begin (h) Any vacancy in the office of a council member shall immediately be filled for the unexpired term. In filling a vacancy, the governor may forgo the requirements of paragraph (c) if the governor has made appointments in full compliance with the requirements of this subdivision within the preceding 12 months. deleted text end Subd. 3a. Redistricting. The legislature shall redraw the boundaries of the councilnew text begin in 2027 to increase districts from 16 to 33 and thereafter shall redraw the boundaries of the councilnew text end districts after each decennial federal census so that each district has substantially equal population. Redistricting is effective in the year ending in the numeral "3." Within 60 days after a redistricting plan takes effect, the deleted text begin governordeleted text end new text begin municipal committeesnew text end shall appoint members from the newly drawn districts to serve terms as provided under subdivision 2a.new text begin A county, city, or township must not be divided into more than one district except as necessary to draw districts with substantially equal populations.new text end Subd. 3f. District boundaries. Metropolitan Council plan MC2023-2, on file with the Geographical Information Systems Office of the Legislative Coordinating Commission and published on its website on March 21, 2023, is adopted and constitutes the redistricting plan required by subdivision 3a. The boundaries of each Metropolitan Council district are as described in that plan. Subd. 4. Chair; appointment, officers, selection; duties and compensation. (a) The deleted text begin chair of thedeleted text end Metropolitan Council shall deleted text begin be appointed by the governor as the 17th voting member thereof by and with the advice and consent of the senate to serve at the pleasure of the governor to represent the metropolitan area at large. Senate confirmation shall be as provided by section 15.066deleted text end new text begin , at its first meeting in each year, elect from its members a chair and a vice-chair. In case of absence or incapacity of the chair, the vice-chair shall perform the chair's dutiesnew text end . The chair of the Metropolitan Council shall, if present, preside at meetings of the council, have the primary responsibility for meeting with local elected officials, serve as the principal legislative liaison, present to the governor and the legislature, after council approval, the council's plans for regional governance and operations, serve as the principal spokesperson of the council, and perform other duties assigned by the council or by law. (b) The Metropolitan Council shall elect other officers as it deems necessary for the conduct of its affairs for a one-year term. A secretary and treasurer need not be members of the Metropolitan Council. Meeting times and places shall be fixed by the Metropolitan Council and special meetings may be called by a majority of the members of the Metropolitan Council or by the chair. The chair and each Metropolitan Council member shall be reimbursed for actual and necessary expenses. (c) Each member of the council shall attend and participate in council meetings and meet regularly with local elected officials and legislative members from the council member's district. Each council member shall serve on at least one division committee for transportation, environment, or community development. (d) In the performance of its duties the Metropolitan Council may adopt policies and procedures governing its operation, establish committees, and, when specifically authorized by law, make appointments to other governmental agencies and districts. Subd. 8. General counsel. The council may appoint a general counsel to serve at the pleasure of the council. new text begin Subd. 9. new text end new text begin Authority to vote; quorum; votes required for action. new text end new text begin (a) The chair and members appointed by the counties and municipal committees may vote on all matters before the council. The commissioner of transportation or the commissioner's designee and the three members appointed by the commissioner may vote only on matters in which the council is acting as the metropolitan planning organization for the region as provided in section 473.146. new text end new text begin (b) A quorum is a majority of the members permitted to vote on a matter. If a quorum is present, the council may act on a majority vote of the members present, except: new text end new text begin (1) if a quorum is present, the council may adopt its levy only if at least 60 percent of the members present vote in favor of the levy; and new text end new text begin (2) if a quorum is present, the council may adopt a metropolitan system plan or plan amendment only if at least 60 percent of the members present vote in favor of its adoption. new text end new text begin Subd. 10. new text end new text begin Transition. new text end new text begin Metropolitan Council members serving on the effective date of this section shall continue to serve until members are appointed from districts by the municipal committees as provided in this section. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE; APPLICATION. new text end new text begin (a) Except as provided in paragraph (b), this section is effective January 1, 2028, and applies in the counties of Anoka, Carver, Dakota, Hennepin, Ramsey, Scott, and Washington. new text end new text begin (b) Subdivisions 1, paragraph (c), and 2b are effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 473.146, subdivision 3, is amended to read: Subd. 3. Development guide; transportation. The transportation chapter must include policies relating to all transportation forms and be designed to promote the legislative determinations, policies, and goals set forth in section 473.371. In addition to the requirements of subdivision 1 regarding the contents of the policy plan, the nontransit element of the transportation chapter must include the following: (1) a statement of the needs and problems of the metropolitan area with respect to the functions covered, including the present and prospective demand for and constraints on access to regional business concentrations and other major activity centers and the constraints on and acceptable levels of development and vehicular trip generation at such centers; (2) the objectives of and the policies to be forwarded by the policy plan; (3) a general description of the physical facilities and services to be developed; (4) a statement as to the general location of physical facilities and service areas; (5) a general statement of timing and priorities in the development of those physical facilities and service areas; (6) a detailed statement, updated every two years, of timing and priorities for improvements and expenditures needed on the metropolitan highway system; (7) a general statement on the level of public expenditure appropriate to the facilities; and (8) a long-range assessment of air transportation trends and factors that may affect airport development in the metropolitan area and policies and strategies that will ensure a comprehensive, coordinated, and timely investigation and evaluation of alternatives for airport development. The council shall develop the nontransit element in consultation with deleted text begin the transportation advisory board anddeleted text end the Metropolitan Airports Commission and cities having an airport located within or adjacent to its corporate boundaries. The council shall also take into consideration the airport development and operations plans and activities of the commission. The council shall transmit the results to the state Department of Transportation. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE; APPLICATION. new text end new text begin This section is effective January 1, 2028, and applies in the counties of Anoka, Carver, Dakota, Hennepin, Ramsey, Scott, and Washington. new text end Sec. 4. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 473.146, subdivision 4, is amended to read: Subd. 4. Transportation planning. (a) The Metropolitan Council is the designated planning agency for any long-range comprehensive transportation planning required by section 134 of the Federal Highway Act of 1962, Section 4 of Urban Mass Transportation Act of 1964 and Section 112 of Federal Aid Highway Act of 1973 and other federal transportation laws. The council shall assure administration and coordination of transportation planning with appropriate state, regional and other agencies, counties, and municipalities. deleted text begin (b) The council shall establish an advisory body consisting of citizens and representatives of municipalities, counties, and state agencies in fulfillment of the planning responsibilities of the council. The membership of the advisory body must consist of: deleted text end deleted text begin (1) the commissioner of transportation or the commissioner's designee; deleted text end deleted text begin (2) the commissioner of the Pollution Control Agency or the commissioner's designee; deleted text end deleted text begin (3) one member of the Metropolitan Airports Commission appointed by the commission; deleted text end deleted text begin (4) one person appointed by the council to represent nonmotorized transportation; deleted text end deleted text begin (5) one person appointed by the commissioner of transportation to represent the freight transportation industry; deleted text end deleted text begin (6) two persons appointed by the council to represent public transit; deleted text end deleted text begin (7) ten elected officials of cities within the metropolitan area, including one representative from each first-class city, appointed by the Association of Metropolitan Municipalities; deleted text end deleted text begin (8) one member of the county board of each county in the seven-county metropolitan area, appointed by the respective county boards; deleted text end deleted text begin (9) eight citizens appointed by the council, one from each council precinct; deleted text end deleted text begin (10) one elected official from a city participating in the replacement service program under section 473.388, appointed by the Suburban Transit Association; and deleted text end deleted text begin (11) one member of the council, appointed by the council. deleted text end deleted text begin (c) The council shall appoint a chair from among the members of the advisory body. deleted text end new text begin (b) The council must establish a technical advisory committee to provide technical expertise to the council on transportation issues. The technical advisory committee must be composed of professional staff from local governments and agencies involved in transportation in the metropolitan area. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE; APPLICATION. new text end new text begin This section is effective January 1, 2028, and applies in the counties of Anoka, Carver, Dakota, Hennepin, Ramsey, Scott, and Washington. new text end Sec. 5. new text begin REPEALER.new text end new text begin Laws 1994, chapter 628, article 1, section 8, new text end new text begin is repealed. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective January 1, 2028. new text end APPENDIX Repealed Minnesota Session Laws: 25-02916 Laws 1994, chapter 628, article 1, section 8 Sec. 8. new text begin SALARIES OF MEMBERS.new text end new text begin Until changed in law after recommendation by the compensation council as provided in Minnesota Statutes, section 15A.082, the chair of the metropolitan council shall receive a salary of $52,500 per year, and the other members shall receive a salary of $20,000 per year. new text end